Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201849-1803
Applicability.

The Uniform Unsworn Foreign Declarations Act applies to an unsworn declaration by a declarant who at the time of making the declaration is physically located outside the boundaries of the United States whether or not the location is subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

Laws 2017, LB57, § 5.